Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-217 Identification.
Identification of goods as goods to which a lease contract refers may be made
at any time and in any manner explicitly agreed to by the parties. In the
absence of explicit agreement, identification occurs:

(1) When the lease contract is made if the lease
contract is for a lease of goods that are existing and identified;

(2) When the goods are shipped, marked, or otherwise
designated by the lessor as goods to which the lease contract refers, if the
lease contract is for a lease of goods that are not existing and identified; or

(3) When the young are conceived, if the lease
contract is for a lease of unborn young of animals. [L 1991, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next